Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.320

Statement of dissolution.

(1) After dissolution, a partner who has not wrongfully dissociated may file a statement of dissolution stating the name of the partnership and that the partnership has dissolved and is winding up its business.

(2) A statement of dissolution cancels all previously filed statements of partnership authority.

(3) For the purposes of RCW 25.05.100 and 25.05.315, a person not a partner is deemed to have notice of the dissolution and the limitation on the partners' authority as a result of the statement of dissolution ninety days after it is filed.

(4) After filing a statement of dissolution, a dissolved partnership may file a statement of partnership authority which will operate with respect to a person not a partner as provided in RCW 25.05.110 (2) and (3) in any transaction, whether or not the transaction is appropriate for winding up the partnership business.

[ 1998 c 103 s 805.]